New Jersey, session 222, A4747.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-45) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) and P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-1 et al.), unless the context clearly requires a different meaning: "At-risk pupils" means those resident pupils from households with a household income at or below the most recent federal poverty guidelines available on October 15 of the prebudget year multiplied by 1.85; "Base per pupil amount" means the cost per elementary pupil of delivering the core curriculum content standards and extracurricular and cocurricular activities necessary for a thorough and efficient education; "Bilingual education pupil" means a resident pupil enrolled in a program of bilingual education or in an English as a second language program approved by the State Board of Education; "Budgeted local share" means the district's local tax levy contained in the budget certified for taxation purposes; "Capital outlay" means capital outlay as defined in GAAP; "Combination pupil" means a resident pupil who is both an at-risk pupil and a bilingual education pupil; "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Education; "Concentration of at-risk pupils" shall be based on prebudget year pupil data and means, for a school district or a county vocational school district, the number of at-risk pupils among those counted in resident enrollment, divided by resident enrollment; "County special services school district" means any entity established pursuant to article 8 of chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes; "County vocational school district" means any entity established pursuant to article 3 of chapter 54 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes; "CPI" means the increase, expressed as a decimal, in the average annualized consumer price index for the New York City and Philadelphia areas in the fiscal year preceding the prebudget year relative to the previous fiscal year as reported by the United States Department of Labor; "Debt service" means payments of principal and interest upon school bonds and other obligations issued to finance the purchase or construction of school facilities, additions to school facilities, or the reconstruction, remodeling, alteration, modernization, renovation or repair of school facilities, including furnishings, equipment, architect fees, and the costs of issuance of such obligations and shall include payments of principal and interest upon bonds heretofore issued to fund or refund such obligations, and upon municipal bonds and other obligations which the commissioner approves as having been issued for such purposes; "District income" means the aggregate income of the residents of the taxing district or taxing districts, based upon data provided by the Division of Taxation in the New Jersey Department of the Treasury and contained on the New Jersey State Income Tax forms for the calendar year ending two years prior to the prebudget year. The commissioner may supplement data contained on the State Income Tax forms with data available from other State or federal agencies in order to better correlate the data to that collected on the federal census.  With respect to regional districts and their constituent districts, however, the district income as described above shall be allocated among the regional and constituent districts in proportion to the number of pupils resident in each of them; "Equalized valuation" means the equalized valuation of the taxing district or taxing districts, as certified by the Director of the Division of Taxation on October 1, or subsequently revised by the tax court by January 15, of the prebudget year.  With respect to regional districts and their constituent districts, however, the equalized valuations as described above shall be allocated among the regional and constituent districts in proportion to the number of pupils resident in each of them. In the event that the equalized table certified by the director shall be revised by the tax court after January 15 of the prebudget year, the revised valuations shall be used in the recomputation of aid for an individual school district filing an appeal, but shall have no effect upon the calculation of the property value rate, Statewide average equalized school tax rate, or Statewide equalized total tax rate; "Full-day preschool" means a preschool day consisting of a minimum six-hour comprehensive educational program in accordance with the district's kindergarten through grade 12 school calendar; "GAAP" means the generally accepted accounting principles established by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board as prescribed by the State board pursuant to N.J.S.18A:4-14; "General special education services pupil" means a pupil receiving specific services pursuant to chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes; "Geographic cost adjustment" means an adjustment that reflects county differences in the cost of providing educational services that are outside the control of the district; "Household income" means income as defined in 7 CFR ss.245.2 and 245.6 or any subsequent superseding federal law or regulation; "Net budget" means the sum of the district's general fund tax levy, State aid received pursuant to the provisions of this act other than preschool education aid, miscellaneous revenue estimated pursuant to GAAP, and designated general fund balance; "Nonpreschool ECPA" means the amount of early childhood program aid, excluding prior year carry-forward amounts, included in a district's 2007-2008 school year budget certified for taxes that was allocated to grades K through 3; "Prebudget year" means the school fiscal year preceding the year in which the school budget is implemented; "Preschool expansion grant" means any grant funded by a portion of preschool education aid allocated by the Commissioner of Education or any other State funds appropriated for the purpose of expanding free access to high-quality preschool for resident three- and four-year old children in districts that do not, at the time of application for a grant, provide State-funded, high-quality, free preschool programs; "Report" means the Educational Adequacy Report issued by the commissioner pursuant to section 4 of this act; "Resident enrollment" means the number of pupils other than preschool pupils, post-graduate pupils, and post-secondary vocational pupils who, on the last school day prior to October 16 of the current school year, are residents of the district and are enrolled in:  (1) the public schools of the district, excluding evening schools, (2) another school district, other than a county vocational school district in the same county on a full-time basis, or a State college demonstration school or private school to which the district of residence pays tuition, or (3) a State facility in which they are placed by the district; or are residents of the district and are:  (1) receiving home instruction, or (2) in a shared-time vocational program and are regularly attending a school in the district and a county vocational school district. In addition, resident enrollment shall include the number of pupils who, on the last school day prior to October 16 of the prebudget year, are residents of the district and in a State facility in which they were placed by the State. Pupils in a shared-time vocational program shall be counted on an equated full-time basis in accordance with procedures to be established by the commissioner.  Resident enrollment shall include regardless of nonresidence, the enrolled children of [teaching staff members] employees of the school district or county vocational school district who are permitted, by contract or local district policy, to enroll their children in the educational program of the school district or county vocational school district without payment of tuition.  Disabled children between three and five years of age and receiving programs and services pursuant to N.J.S.18A:46-6 shall be included in the resident enrollment of the district; "School district" means any local or regional school district established pursuant to chapter 8 or chapter 13 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes; "State facility" means a State developmental center, a State Division of Youth and Family Services' residential center, a State residential mental health center, a Department of Children and Families Regional Day School, a State training school/secure care facility, a State juvenile community program, a juvenile detention center or a boot camp under the supervisional authority of the Youth Justice Commission pursuant to P.L.1995, c.284 (C.52:17B-169 et seq.), or an institution operated by or under contract with the Department of Corrections, Children and Families or Human Services, or the Youth Justice Commission; "Statewide equalized school tax rate" means the amount calculated by dividing the general fund tax levy for all school districts, which excludes county vocational school districts and county special services school districts as defined pursuant to this section, in the State for the prebudget year by the equalized valuations certified in the year prior to the prebudget year of all taxing districts in the State except taxing districts for which there are not school tax levies; "Tax levy growth limitation" means the permitted annual increase in the adjusted tax levy for a school district as calculated pursuant to sections 3 and 4 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-38 and 18A:7F-39). (cf: P.L.2025, c.100, s.4) 2.    N.J.S.18A:38-3 is amended to read as follows: 18A:38-3. a. Any person not resident in a school district, if eligible except for residence, may be admitted to the schools of the district with the consent of the board of education upon such terms, and with payment of tuition, as the board prescribes.  Each board of education, with the approval of the executive county superintendent, shall establish a uniform tuition amount for any nonresident student admitted to the schools of a district pursuant to this section. b.    Any person not resident in a school district, if eligible except for residence, and if that person previously was a resident of the district, shall be admitted to the schools of the district without payment of tuition if that person's parent or guardian is a member of the New Jersey National Guard or a member of the reserve component of the armed forces of the United States and has been ordered into active military service in any of the armed forces of the United States in time of war or national emergency, resulting in the relocation of the student out of the district.  A school district admitting a student pursuant to this subsection shall not be obligated for transportation costs. c.     The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not apply, regardless of residence, to the enrolled children of [teaching staff members] employees of the school district who are permitted, by contract or local district policy, to enroll their children in the educational program of the school district without payment of tuition. d.    Nothing in this section shall limit a school district's ability to charge tuition pursuant to any other federal law, State statute, regulation, or court order. e.     The provisions of this section shall not apply to a county vocational school district. (cf: P.L.2023, c.61, s.1) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.